Massachusetts, session 194th, H375.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 28A in Chapter 140D of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by striking out paragraph (2) and inserting in place thereof the
following paragraph:-
(2) A seller in any sales transaction who imposes a surcharge on a cardholder who elects
to use a credit card in lieu of payment by cash, check, or similar means shall inform the
purchaser of the surcharge by a sign conspicuously posted on the seller’s premises, as well as on
every receipt which shall identify the amount of such surcharge and its relationship to the seller’s
cost of accepting credit cards.
of 1